Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 4.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) The appropriation of state moneys is the sole duty of the legislature, and the legislature has the sole authority to choose the means of discharging any constitutional or statutory duty.(2) Pursuant to the legislature's sole authority to make appropriations, entities or persons seeking declaratory relief, injunctive relief, or any other judicial determination regarding claims against the state for alleged violations of constitutional or statutory duties or rights shall have no remedy that requires the legislature to:(a) Make appropriations or payments of state funds above levels contained in any enacted omnibus budget;(b) Redirect any appropriated or nonappropriated moneys; or(c) Make any distribution or redistribution of appropriated or nonappropriated funds.--- END ---